Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.090

Injury to person or intention concerning.

When the crime involves the commission of, or an attempt to commit a private injury, and is described with sufficient certainty in other respects to identify the act, an erroneous allegation as to the person injured or intended to be injured is not material.

[Code 1881 s 1010; 1873 p 226 s 193; 1869 p 241 s 188; RRS s 2061.]